Tennessee, session 114, SB0797.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 8-50-114(h), is amended by
designating the existing language as subdivision (1) and adding the following subdivision (2):
(2) Subdivision (h)(1) applies to full-time employees of the general assembly
who work more hours each week than typically required of full-time employment for at
least four (4) weeks per year.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB0797
000806
- 1 -